Hawaii statutes.
§461-2 Board of pharmacy; appointment;
qualifications. There shall be a board of pharmacy of seven members.

Five members of the board shall be graduates of
a school or college of pharmacy and shall have been licensed as pharmacists and
actively engaged in the practice of pharmacy for at least five years prior to
their appointment and two shall be public members. Four members of the board
shall be residents of the city and county of Honolulu and three shall be
residents of counties other than the city and county of Honolulu. [L 1949, c
175, pt of §1; RL 1955, §71-2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§5, 15; HRS §461-2; am L
1978, c 208, §11; am L 1992, c 202, §135; am L 1993, c 322, §12]

Cross References

Departmental administration, see §§26-9 and 26-35.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next